scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_V.yaml
     abashkwebiigizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabashkwebiigiz
     abashkwebiigizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabashkwebiigiz
     abashkwebiigizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabashkwebiigiz
     abashkwebiigizi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abashkwebiigizid
     abashkwebiigizi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebashkwebiigizid
     abaabasige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaabasige
     abaabasige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaabasige
     abaabasige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaabasiged
     abaabasige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaabasiged
     abaabaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaabas
     abaabaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaabas
     abaabaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabaabas
     abaabaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaabaso
     abaabaso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaabasod
     abaabaso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaabasod
     abaagamizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaagamizige
     abaagamizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaagamizige
     abaagamizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabaagamizige
     abaagamizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaagamizige
     abaagamizige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaagamiziged
     abaagamizige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaagamiziged
     abaakiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaakiganez
     abaakiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaakiganezo
     abaakiganezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaakiganezod
     abaakiganezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaakiganezod
     abaasandeke+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaasandeke
     abaasandeke+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaasandeke
     abaasandeke+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabaasandeke
     abaasandeke+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaasandeke
     abaasandeke+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaasandeked
     abaasandeke+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaasandeked
     abaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaas
     abaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaas
     abaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabaas
     abaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaaso
     abaaso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaasod
     abaaso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaasod
     abaawiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabaawiganez
     abaawiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabaawiganez
     abaawiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabaawiganez
     abaawiganezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaawiganezo
     abaawiganezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abaawiganezod
     abaawiganezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebaawiganezod
     abi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indab
     abi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindab
     abi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidab
     abi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abi
     abi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: abiyaan
     abi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abid
     abi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebid
     abidiyezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabidiyez
     abidiyezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abidiyezo
     abidiyezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abidiyezod
     abidiyezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebidiyezod
     abininjiizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabininjiiz
     abininjiizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabininjiiz
     abininjiizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabininjiiz
     abininjiizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abininjiizo
     abininjiizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abininjiizod
     abininjiizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebininjiizod
     abininjiizo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: abininjiizon
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabinoojiinyikaaz
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabinoojiinyikaaz
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabinoojiinyikaaz
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abinoojiinyikaazo
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abinoojiinyikaazod
     abinoojiinyikaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebinoojiinyikaazod
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabinoojiinyiw
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabinoojiinyiw
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabinoojiinyiw
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abinoojiinyiwi
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abinoojiinyiwid
     abinoojiinyiwi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebinoojiinyiwid
     abizidezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabizidez
     abizidezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabizidez
     abizidezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabizidez
     abizidezo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizidezo
     abizidezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizidezod
     abizidezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebizidezod
     abizigaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizigaazo
     abizigaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizigaazod
     abizigaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebizigaazod
     abizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabizige
     abizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabizige
     abizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabizige
     abizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizige
     abizige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abiziged
     abizige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebiziged
     abizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabiz
     abizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabiz
     abizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabiz
     abizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizo
     abizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizod
     abizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebizod
     abizo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: abizon
     abizodizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabizodiz
     abizodizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizodizo
     abizodizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abizodizod
     abizodizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebizodizod
     abiigizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabiigizige
     abiigizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabiigizige
     abiigizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabiigizige
     abiigizige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abiigizige
     abiigizige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abiigiziged
     abiingwezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabiingwez
     abiingwezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abiingwezo
     abiingwezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abiingwezod
     abiingwezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebiingwezod
     abwaajige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwaajige
     abwaajige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwaajige
     abwaajige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwaajige
     abwaajige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwaajiged
     abwaajige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwaajiged
     abwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwe
     abwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwe
     abwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwe
     abwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwe
     abwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwed
     abwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwed
     abwemaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwemaagoz
     abwemaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwemaagozi
     abwemaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwemaagozid
     abwemaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwemaagozid
     abwendibe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwendibe
     abwendibe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwendibe
     abwendibe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwendibed
     abwendibe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwendibed
     abwenike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwenike
     abwenike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwenike
     abwenike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwenike
     abwenike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abweniked
     abwenike+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebweniked
     abwewasige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwewasige
     abwewasige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwewasige
     abwewasige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwewasige
     abwewasige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwewasiged
     abwewasige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwewasiged
     abweyiingwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabweyiingwe
     abweyiingwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abweyiingwe
     abweyiingwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebweyiingwed
     abwezide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwezide
     abwezide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwezide
     abwezide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwezide
     abwezide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwezide
     abwezide+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwezided
     abwezide+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwezided
     abwezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwez
     abwezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwez
     abwezo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwez
     abwezo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwezo
     abwezo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwezod
     abwezo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwezod
     abwiike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwiike
     abwiike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwiike
     abwiike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwiike
     abwiike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwiike
     abwiike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: abwiikeyaan
     abwiike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwiiked
     abwiike+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwiiked
     abwiike+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: abwiiken
     achaabike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindachaabike
     achaabike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achaabike
     achaabike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achaabiked
     achaabike+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: echaabiked
     achaawise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indachaawise
     achaawise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achaawise
     achaawise+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achaawised
     achaawise+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: echaawised
     achigaazo+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achigaazo
     achigaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achigaazod
     achigaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: echigaazod
     achige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indachige
     achige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindachige
     achige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidachige
     achige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achige
     achige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: achiged
     achige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: echiged
     adaandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: indadaandimin
     adaandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: adaandiwaad
     adaandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: adaandiwag
     adaandiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: edaandiwaad
     adaawange+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawange
     adaawange+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawange
     adaawange+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawange
     adaawange+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawange
     adaawange+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawanged
     adaawange+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawanged
     adaawangeshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawangeshk
     adaawangeshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawangeshki
     adaawangeshki+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawangeshkid
     adaawangeshki+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawangeshkid 
     adaawaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawaage
     adaawaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawaage
     adaawaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawaage
     adaawaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawaage
     adaawaage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawaaged
     adaawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawe
     adaawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawe
     adaawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawe
     adaawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawe
     adaawe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawed
     adaawe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawed
     adaawensi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawens
     adaawensi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawensi
     adaawensi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawensid
     adaawensi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawensid
     adaawetamaadiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: indadaawetamaadimin
     adaawetamaadiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: adaawetamaadiwag
     adaawetamaadiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: adaawetamaadiwaad
     adaawetamaadiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: edaawetamaadiwaad
     adaawetamaadiwag+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl: adaawetamaadig
     adaawetamaadizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawetamaadiz
     adaawetamaadizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaadizo
     adaawetamaadizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaadizod
     adaawetamaadizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawetamaadizod
     adaawetamaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ndadawetamaage
     adaawetamaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaage
     adaawetamaage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaaged
     adaawetamaage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawetamaaged
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawetamaaz
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawetamaaz
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawetamaaz
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaazo
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawetamaazod
     adaawetamaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawetamaazod
     adaawewikwewi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawewikwew
     adaawewikwewi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewikwewi
     adaawewikwewi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewikwewid
     adaawewikwewi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawewikwewid
     adaawewininiikwewi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawewininiikwew
     adaawewininiikwewi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewininiikwewi
     adaawewininiikwewi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewininiikwewid
     adaawewininiikwewi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawewininiikwewid
     adaawewininiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawewininiiw
     adaawewininiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewininiiwi
     adaawewininiiwi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawewininiiwid
     adaawewininiiwi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawewininiiwid
     adimanike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadimanike
     adimanike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adimanike
     adimanike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adimaniked
     adimanike+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edimaniked
     adisigaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adisigaazo
     adisigaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adisigaazod
     adisigaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edisigaazod
     adisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadisige
     adisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadisige
